District of Columbia statutes.
8-1772.02

Commercial property energy conservation.

A commercial property shall keep exterior doors and windows closed when an air conditioner that cools the adjacent area is in operation, except:

(1)

During a reasonable period of ingress and egress of people or the delivery or shipping of goods;

(2)

Where the door is intended for vehicular access to or for a loading dock;

(3)

When an emergency situation exists requiring an exterior door or window to be kept open; or

(4)

When a commercial property implements an alternative strategy authorized by the Mayor through regulation as a reasonably equivalent means of conserving energy.

History

Mar. 19, 2013, D.C. Law 19-252, § 202, 59 DCR 14932

Section References

This section is referenced in § 8-1772.03.